Idaho, session 2025, S1125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 63, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6303, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6303. DEFENSE OF STATE LAW -- POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (1) As used
in this section:
(a) "Council" means the constitutional defense council created in sec-
tion 67-6301, Idaho Code.
(b) "Political subdivision" is as defined in section 6-902, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) A political subdivision may request that the state of Idaho
provide assistance with or participation in a legal action involving a
challenge to the constitutionality of a state statute by submitting a
written request to the council that includes:
(i) A detailed explanation as to why state assistance or partici-
pation would be appropriate;
(ii) A synopsis of the nature of the action and the procedural sta-
tus of the case; and
(iii) Such other information as the council may require.
(b) Such assistance or participation may include:
(i) Funding for private counsel from the constitutional defense
council fund created in section 67-6301, Idaho Code;
(ii) Reimbursement to the political subdivision for attorney's
fees and costs;
(iii) Assistance from the Idaho attorney general; or
(iv) Intervention by the state.
(3)(a) The council shall deliver its decision on assistance or partici-
pation to the political subdivision in writing as soon as practicable.
(b) In determining whether to grant, deny, or partially grant or deny a
political subdivision's request, the council shall, in its sole discre-
tion, consider:
(i) Whether the public interest would be served by state assis-
tance or participation in the legal action;
(ii) Whether state resources, including personnel time and funds,
are available; and
(iii) Whether the legal action is likely to restore, maintain, and
advance the state of Idaho's sovereignty and authority.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.